District of Columbia statutes.
46-356.08

Confirmed order.

Confirmation of a registered support order, whether by operation of law or after notice and hearing, precludes further contest of the order with respect to any matter that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

History

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 608, 63 DCR 222